Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 1
POLLING LOCATIONS

Cross references:

For early voters' polling place, see § 1-8-204.

1-5-101. Establishing precincts and polling places for partisan elections.

Subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, the county clerk and recorder of each county shall divide the county into as many election precincts for all general, primary, and congressional vacancy elections as is convenient for the eligible electors of the county and shall designate the place for each precinct at which elections are to be held. In establishing boundaries, the board of county commissioners shall take into consideration natural and artificial boundaries that meet the requirements of the United States bureau of the census. The precincts shall be numbered in accordance with section 1-5-101.5. Changes in the precinct boundaries of a county shall be made only within the district boundaries of each representative and senatorial district.

Repealed.

Every county clerk and recorder, subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, shall establish at least one precinct for every one thousand five hundred active eligible electors in the county at the time of the most recent federal decennial census. However, the county clerk and recorder, subject to approval by the board, may establish one precinct for every two thousand active eligible electors.

The precincts established by the county clerk and recorder in subsection (3)(a) of this section need not be modified until the precincts have more than twice as many active eligible electors as they did at the time of the most recent federal decennial census, or when they were established by the county clerk and recorder, whichever is later.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 1-5-103, and except as otherwise required by federal law, in order to facilitate the preparation of a computerized database for use in the redistricting process that will take place after the decennial census in years ending in the number zero, the precinct boundaries established by the county clerk and recorder of each county, subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, that are used in the general election in years ending in the number eight shall remain in effect until after the general election in years ending in the number zero; except that the precincts so established may be subdivided within the boundaries of the original precinct and adjacent precincts may be aggregated for purposes of data collection. In establishing precinct boundaries pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (5), county clerk and recorders and boards of county commissioners shall, to the extent reasonably possible, utilize natural and man-made boundaries that meet the requirements for visible features adopted by the United States bureau of the census. If the precinct boundaries used in the general election in years ending in the number eight are changed prior to the next general election in years ending in the number zero pursuant to federal law, the county clerk and recorders shall timely submit in writing to the director of research of the legislative council a list showing the precincts for which the boundaries have changed.

Repealed.

In any county, the county clerk and recorder may alter the precinct boundaries when necessary to ensure that no precinct is located in more than one county commissioner district.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 700, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 835, § 45, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(5) added, p. 1056, § 2, effective May 27; (4) added, p. 5, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 635, § 8, effective May 6.

L. 99:

(4) amended, p. 1389, § 7, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 265, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2004:

(4) repealed, p. 1104, § 2, effective May 27; (3) amended, p. 1343, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 1778, § 12, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(5) amended, p. 1743, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 703, § 29, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(2) repealed, (3) amended, and (7) added, (HB 21-1047), ch. 70, p. 288, § 5, effective April 29.

1-5-101.5. Precinct numbering.

There is hereby created a precinct numbering system that shall be used by the county clerk and recorder of each county of the state in numbering election precincts established in accordance with section 1-5-101. The precinct numbering system created pursuant to this section shall not be used until the reapportionment of senatorial and representative districts required to be conducted after the 2000 federal census pursuant to section 48 of article V of the Colorado constitution is completed, but the precinct numbering system shall be implemented by each county clerk and recorder no later than July 1, 2002.

Any election precinct established pursuant to the provisions of section 1-5-101 shall be numbered with a ten digit number as follows:

The first digit of the precinct number shall consist of the number of the congressional district in which the precinct is contained.

The second and third digits of the precinct number shall consist of the number of the state senatorial district in which the precinct is contained. If the state senatorial district consists of one digit, such digit shall be preceded by a zero for purposes of the precinct number.

The fourth and fifth digits of the precinct number shall consist of the number of the state representative district in which the precinct is contained. If the state representative district consists of one digit, such digit shall be preceded by a zero for purposes of the precinct number.

The sixth and seventh digits of the precinct number shall consist of the number assigned by the secretary of state to represent the county in which the precinct is contained.

The last three digits of the precinct number shall consist of an individual precinct number as determined by the county clerk and recorder.

Any changes in election precinct numbering required pursuant to this section shall be completed and reported by the county clerk and recorder to the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-5-103 (3).

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 264, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001:

IP(2) amended and (2)(c.5) added, p. 1003, § 8, effective August 8.

1-5-102. Establishing precincts and voter service and polling centers for nonpartisan elections.

For nonpartisan elections other than coordinated elections, no later than twenty-five days prior to the election, the designated election official, with the approval of the governing body with authority to call elections, shall divide the jurisdiction into as many election precincts as it deems expedient for the convenience of eligible electors of the jurisdiction and shall designate the polling place for each precinct. The election precincts shall consist of one or more whole general election precincts wherever practicable, and the designated election official and governing body shall cooperate with the county clerk and recorder and the board of county commissioners of their political subdivisions to accomplish this purpose. Wherever possible, the polling places shall be the same as those designated by the county for partisan elections.

The county clerk and recorder, no later than one hundred twenty days prior to a regular special district election or regular election of any other political subdivision, shall prepare a map of the county showing the location of the voter service and polling centers and precinct boundaries utilized in the last November election. Copies of the map shall be available for inspection at the office of the county clerk and recorder and for distribution to the designated election official of each political subdivision.

The county clerk and recorder shall maintain a list of owners or contact persons who, to the clerk's knowledge, may grant permission to political subdivisions to use the locations identified on the map for voter service and polling centers. The clerk shall, upon request of the designated election official of a political subdivision, provide a copy of the list, or a part of the list as requested by the designated election official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 700, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1155, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 836, § 46, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1741, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 770, § 37, effective May 20.

L. 2013:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 704, § 30, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (2) and (3) were amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-102.5. Establishing polling places for coordinated elections. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1408, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 582, § 15, effective April 30.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 771, § 38, effective May 20.

L. 2004:

(2) repealed, p. 1104, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-102.7. Combining precincts and polling places - vote centers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1105, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(5) and (8) amended, p. 2031, § 9, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(4) and (5)(b) amended, p. 1974, § 15, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-102.9. Voter service and polling centers - number required - services provided - drop-off locations - definition.

For general elections, each county clerk and recorder shall designate a minimum number of voter service and polling centers, as follows:

For counties with at least two hundred fifty thousand active electors:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the fifth day before the election, at least one voter service and polling center for each seventy-five thousand active electors;

During the period from the fourth day before the election to the second day before the election, at least one voter service and polling center for each twenty thousand active electors; and

On the day before the election and on election day, at least one voter service and polling center for each twelve thousand five hundred active electors.

For counties with at least thirty-seven thousand five hundred but fewer than two hundred fifty thousand active electors:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the fifth day before the election, at least one voter service and polling center for each seventy-five thousand active electors; except that there must be at least one voter service and polling center in each such county;

During the period from the fourth day before the election to the day before the election, at least one voter service and polling center for each twenty thousand active electors; and

On election day, at least one voter service and polling center for each twelve thousand five hundred active electors.

For counties with at least ten thousand but fewer than thirty-seven thousand five hundred active electors:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the day before the election, at least one voter service and polling center; and

On election day, at least three voter service and polling centers.

For counties with fewer than ten thousand active electors, during the fifteen-day period prior to and including the day of the election, at least one voter service and polling center.

For the purposes of subsections (1)(a) and (5) of this section, the number of active electors in a county is the number of active electors registered in the county on the date of the previous presidential election or on the date of the last general election, whichever is greater.

Repealed.

For a general election, a county clerk and recorder shall designate a voter service and polling center on the campus of a state institution of higher education located within the county as follows:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the second day before the election, one voter service and polling center on each campus that has ten thousand or more enrolled students; and

On the day before the election and on election day, one voter service and polling center on each campus that has two thousand or more enrolled students.

In a county described in subsection (1)(a)(I) or (1)(a)(II) of this section, a voter service and polling center designated in accordance with this subsection (1)(b.5) may count toward the minimum requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. In all other counties, a voter service and polling center designated in accordance with this subsection (1)(b.5) must be in addition to the minimum requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section.

A county clerk and recorder shall confer with a state institution of higher education about the location for a voter service and polling center designated on a campus.

A voter service and polling center designated under this subsection (1)(b.5) on a campus that has twenty thousand or more enrolled students on January 1 of the year of the election must be located within the student center unless such placement creates an undue burden for the institution of higher education.

As used in this subsection (1)(b.5), the number of enrolled students at a campus is the highest number of all full-time, part-time, graduate, and undergraduate students, not including students solely registered for online courses and concurrent enrollment students, during the fall semester of the year of the previous general election according to data collected by the department of higher education. The department of higher education shall provide the data to the secretary of state on or before December 1 of each general election year. The secretary of state shall determine from the data which campuses meet the enrollment thresholds for the next general election.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b.5)(V)(A) of this section, due to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, for any election for which the number of enrolled students would be based on data from the fall semester of 2020, the secretary of state shall use data for the fall semester of 2019 instead of data from the fall semester of 2020 to determine the number of enrolled students for purposes of subsection (1)(b.5)(I) of this section. The department of higher education shall provide the data for the fall semester of 2019 to the secretary of state on or before October 1, 2021.

As used in this subsection (1)(b.5), "campus" means any collection of buildings and surrounding grounds owned or used by a state institution of higher education to regularly provide students with education, housing, or college activities. If one or more state institutions of higher education share buildings or grounds, or if the campuses of one or more state institutions of higher education are adjacent or otherwise connected, the shared or connected buildings and grounds constitute a single campus for the purposes of this subsection (1)(b.5).

For a general election, at the request of the tribal council of an Indian tribe located on a federal reservation whose headquarters are within the county's boundaries, a county clerk and recorder shall designate a voter service and polling center within the boundaries of the reservation on the day before election day and on election day. A request under this subsection (1)(b.7) must be made no later than one hundred eighty days before the date of the election.

In designating voter service and polling center locations pursuant to this subsection (1), each county clerk and recorder shall consider the following factors to address the needs of the county:

Proximity to public transportation lines and availability of parking;

Geographic features, such as mountain passes, that tend to affect access and convenience;

Equitable distribution across the county so as to afford maximally convenient options for electors;

The existence and location of population centers;

Access for persons with disabilities;

Use of existing voting locations that typically serve a significant number of electors;

Use of public buildings that are known to electors in the county, especially to the extent that using such buildings results in cost savings compared to other potential locations;

When private locations are considered or designated as voter service and polling centers in accordance with section 1-5-105 (3), methods and standards to ensure the security of voting conducted at such locations;

Proximity to historically under-represented communities;

If a proposed location was used in a previous election, the number of electors that used the location in the previous election and the recorded wait times at the location, or the number of electors and recorded wait times at nearby locations; and

The need to place voter service and polling centers in population centers that had lower voter turnout in previous elections.

(I.5) A county clerk and recorder who requests the use of a public building that receives funding from government sources to designate as a voter service and polling center or drop box site shall be given priority over other uses of the building. The appropriate authority for the building may charge the clerk and recorder a reasonable rental fee not to exceed the usual rental rate for the building.

In designating voter service and polling centers, a county clerk and recorder shall solicit public comments. The county clerk and recorder shall post a notice seeking public comment no later than two hundred fifty days before the election and shall accept comments through the one hundred ninetieth day before the election.

A county clerk and recorder shall not designate a police station, sheriff's office, or town marshal's office as a voter service and polling center; except that a county clerk and recorder may designate as a voter service and polling center a multipurpose building that includes a police station, sheriff's office, or town marshal's office.

A county clerk and recorder may apply to the secretary of state for a waiver of the requirements of subsection (1)(c)(III)(A) of this section. If the secretary of state finds that there is not another equivalent site for a voter service and polling center nearby, the secretary of state shall grant the waiver.

Each county clerk and recorder shall submit the proposed voter service and polling center locations to the secretary of state as part of the election plan.

A county clerk and recorder may designate a greater number of voter service and polling centers than the minimum required by this section.

Voter service and polling centers must be open, at a minimum, for the fifteen-day period prior to and including the day of the election as follows:

In a county described in subsection (1)(a)(I) or (1)(a)(II) of this section:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the day before the election, voter service and polling centers must be open continuously at least from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m.; except that voter service and polling centers are not required to be open on Sundays or on the first Saturday of this period.

On election day, voter service and polling centers must be open continuously from 7 a.m. to 7 p.m.

In all other counties:

During the period from the fifteenth day before the election to the day before the election, voter service and polling centers must be open during the normal business hours for the county; except that voter service and polling centers are not required to be open on Sundays or on the first Saturday of this period, and must be open for at least four hours continuously on the second Saturday of this period.

On election day, voter service and polling centers must be open continuously from 7 a.m. to 7 p.m.

Each voter service and polling center must provide:

The ability for an eligible elector to register to vote pursuant to section 1-2-217.7;

The ability for an eligible elector to cast a ballot;

The ability for an eligible elector to update his or her address pursuant to section 1-2-217.7;

The ability for an eligible elector who has legally changed his or her name to have his or her name changed pursuant to section 1-2-218;

The ability for an unaffiliated registered elector to affiliate with a political party and cast a ballot in a primary election;

Secure computer access;

Facilities and equipment that are compliant with the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended;

Direct record electronic voting machines or other voting systems accessible to electors with disabilities as provided in part 7 of article 5 of this title;

Voting booths;

Original and replacement ballots for distribution;

Mail ballots to requesting electors, including a sufficient supply of replacement ballots or the ability to print a sufficient number of ballots on demand to provide to registered electors in the event there are technical problems accessing the centralized statewide voter registration system maintained pursuant to section 1-2-301;

The ability to accept mail ballots that are deposited by electors;

The ability of a person to cast a provisional ballot; and

The ability of a person to obtain and return a form pursuant to section 1-7.5-107.3 (2)(a) confirming the person returned a ballot or to provide a copy of identification or a signature in accordance with section 1-2-502.5 (4)(c), 1-7.5-107 (3.5)(d), or 1-7.5-107.3 (1.5), in order to cure a ballot the person previously cast.

(3.5) If an elector desires to vote by casting a ballot at a voter service and polling center but there are technical problems accessing the centralized statewide voter registration system maintained pursuant to section 1-2-301 at the voter service and polling center, the elector shall be allowed to obtain and cast a replacement mail ballot if the elector's registration can be verified by contacting the county clerk and recorder by telephone or electronic mail, if practical, or by other means. If the elector's eligibility cannot be verified by a voter service and polling center election judge, the elector is entitled to cast a provisional ballot in accordance with article 8.5 of this title 1.

Repealed.

In addition to providing voter service and polling centers in accordance with this section, counties shall also establish drop boxes for the purpose of allowing electors to deposit their completed mail ballots in a general election as follows:

For counties with at least two hundred fifty thousand active electors, at least one drop box for each twelve thousand five hundred active electors.

For counties with at least thirty-seven thousand five hundred but fewer than two hundred fifty thousand active electors, at least one drop box for each fifteen thousand active electors.

For counties with at least fifteen thousand but fewer than thirty-seven thousand five hundred active electors, at least two drop boxes.

For counties with fewer than fifteen thousand active electors, at least one drop box.

For a general election, in addition to the requirements of subsection (5)(a) of this section, a county shall establish a drop box on each campus of a state institution of higher education located within the county that has two thousand or more enrolled students as determined in accordance with subsection (1)(b.5)(III) of this section.

Each drop box must accept mail ballots delivered by electors for the fifteen-day period prior to and including the day of the election.

The placement and security of each drop box must be determined by each county, subject to the requirements of subsection (5)(d)(II) of this section and in accordance with the secretary of state's current security rules. Counties are encouraged to establish drop boxes in community-based locations.

A county clerk and recorder shall not establish a drop box at a police station, sheriff's office, or town marshal's office; except that:

A county clerk and recorder may establish a drop box in a multipurpose building that includes either the county clerk and recorder's office or the municipal clerk's office and also includes a police station, sheriff's office, or town marshal's office; and

The requirements of this subsection (5)(d)(II) do not apply to a drop box that was established on or before June 21, 2021.

For a general election, in addition to the requirements of subsection (5)(a) of this section, at the request of the tribal council of an Indian tribe located on a federal reservation whose headquarters are within the county's boundaries, a county shall establish a drop-off location within the boundaries of the reservation. The drop-off location must accept ballots for the fifteen-day period prior to and including the day of the election.

A county may establish additional drop-off locations at the county's discretion. A drop-off location must be located in a secure place under the supervision of a municipal clerk, an election judge, or a member of the clerk and recorder's staff.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 704, § 31, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(3)(f) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 578, § 37, effective May 18.

L. 2019:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(I), (1)(c)(I)(G), (1)(c)(I)(H), (1)(c)(II), (1)(d), (2), and (3.5) amended, (1)(b.5), (1)(b.7), (1)(c)(I)(I), (1)(c)(I.5), (1)(c)(III), (5), and (6) added, and (4) repealed, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3020, § 30, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(1)(b.5)(V), (1)(c)(I)(H), IP(2)(a), (3)(k), (3)(l), (3)(m), and (5)(d) amended, (1)(c)(I)(J), (1)(c)(I)(K), and (3)(n) added, and (6) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1644, § 28, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(b)(II)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(b)(II), effective January 1, 2017. (See L. 2013, p. 704.)

Cross references:

(1) In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-5-103. Changes in boundaries - partisan elections.

Changes in the boundaries of precincts or the creation of new precincts for partisan elections must be completed no later than twenty-nine days prior to the first Tuesday in March, except in cases of precinct changes resulting from changes in county boundaries.

Subject to approval by the board of county commissioners, the county clerk and recorder shall change the location of any polling location upon a petition of a majority of the eligible electors residing within a county if the request is made at least ninety days prior to the primary election.

All changes in precinct boundaries or numbering for partisan elections, including changes required pursuant to section 1-5-101.5, shall be reported within ten days by the county clerk and recorder to the secretary of state, and a corrected precinct map shall be transmitted to the secretary of state as soon as possible after the changes have been effected.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 701, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1769, § 26, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 836, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 771, § 39, effective May 20.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 265, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 134, § 5, effective March 27.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 707, § 32, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1646, § 29, effective June 21.

1-5-104. Changes in boundaries - nonpartisan elections.

Changes in the boundaries of precincts or the creation of new precincts for nonpartisan elections shall be completed no later than twenty-five days prior to scheduled elections, except in cases of precinct changes resulting from changes in the jurisdiction's boundaries.

All changes in precinct boundaries or numbering for nonpartisan elections shall be reported to the county clerk and recorder within ten days by the designated election official, and a corrected precinct map shall be transmitted to the county clerk and recorder as soon as possible after the changes have been effected.

Each governing body shall change any polling place upon a petition of a majority of the eligible electors residing within a precinct if the request is made at least forty-five days prior to the next scheduled election and another polling place location is reasonably available.

Except as provided by law, no polling place shall be changed after the twenty-fifth day prior to an election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 701, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1408, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1742, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 771, § 40, effective May 20.

1-5-105. Restrictions.

No election-related activity may be conducted within one hundred feet of any building in which a polling location or drop-off location is located except that of the conduct of the election at the polling location or drop-off location.

No polling location or drop-off location shall be located in a room in which any intoxicating malt, spirituous, or vinous liquors are being served.

The polling locations or drop-off locations shall be in public locations wherever possible. A private location may be used only when no appropriate public location is available.

For the purposes of subsection (1) of this section and section 1-13-714, when a polling location or drop-off location is within a multi-use building such as a shopping mall or county office building, the "building" is considered the room in which ballots are cast, any waiting room or hall where electors wait to vote, as well as a primary corridor where electors walk to an interior polling location or drop-off location, and the designated exterior door to the multi-use building in which the polling location or drop-off location is located.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 701, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1408, § 42, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) added, p. 836, § 48, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 708, § 33, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-101 (5) and (6) as it existed prior to 1992. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located at the back of the index.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-106. Polling location or drop-off location - designation by sign.

All polling locations must be designated by signs conspicuously posted pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section at least twenty days before each election and during the period polling locations are open. The sign shall be substantially in the following form: "Polling place/voter service and polling center for county ....". The lettering on the sign must be black on a white background. The letters and numerals of the title must be at least four inches in height. In addition, the sign must state the hours the polling location will be open.

At a minimum, each polling location must be marked by at least one outdoor sign at each entrance to the parking lot or building where the polling location is located and indoor signs sufficient to locate the polling location once inside the building.

All stand-alone drop-off locations must be designated by a sign conspicuously posted during the time that drop-off locations are available to receive mail ballots.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 702, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 836, § 49, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1975, § 16, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 708, § 34, effective May 10.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1646, § 30, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-6-102 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-5-107. Polling places for disabled electors - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 702, § 8, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2004:

(2) added by revision, pp. 1361, 1213, §§ 30, 31, 108.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2006. (See L. 2004, pp. 1361, 1213.)

1-5-108. Election judges may change polling locations and drop-off locations.

If it becomes impossible or impracticable to hold an election because of an emergency at the designated polling location, the election judges, after assembling at or as near as practicable to the original designated polling location, may move to the nearest convenient place for holding the election and at the newly designated place forthwith proceed with the election. The election judges shall notify the designated election official of the change as soon as possible.

Upon moving to a new polling location, the election judges shall display a proclamation of the change at the original polling location to notify all electors of the new location for holding the election. The proclamation must contain a statement explaining the specific nature of the emergency that required the change in the polling location and must provide the street address of the new location.

If an emergency renders a drop-off location impossible or impracticable for use in an election, the designated election official shall relocate the drop-off location to the nearest convenient place.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 583, § 16, effective April 30.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 708, § 35, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.